North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 4. Secretary of State.

§ 147-34.
Office and office hours.

The Secretary of State shall attend at his office, in the City of Raleigh, between the hours of 10 o’clock A.M. and three o’clock P.M., on every day of the year, Sundays and legal holidays excepted.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 44; 1870-1, c. 111; Code, s. 3339; Rev., s. 5344; C.S., s. 7652.

§ 147-35.
Salary of Secretary of State.

The salary of the Secretary of State shall be set by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act. In addition to the salary set by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act, longevity pay shall be paid on the same basis as is provided to employees of the State who are subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act.

History.

1879, c. 240, s. 6; 1881, p. 632, res; Code, s. 3724; Rev., s. 2741; 1907, c. 994; 1919, c. 247, s. 2; C.S., s. 3863; Ex. Sess. 1920, c. 49, s. 4; 1921, c. 11, s. 1; 1931, c. 277; 1933, c. 46; 1935, c. 304; 1941, c. 1; 1947, c. 1041; 1949, c. 1278; 1953, c. 1, s. 2; 1957, c. 1; 1963, c. 1178, s. 1; 1967, c. 1130; c. 1237, s. 1; 1969, c. 1214, s. 1; 1971, c. 912, s. 1; 1973, c. 778, s. 1; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 14; 1977, c. 802, s. 42.7; 1983, c. 761, s. 212; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 164; 1987, c. 738, s. 32(b); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 147-36.
Duties of Secretary of State.

It is the duty of the Secretary of State:

To perform such duties as may then be devolved upon the Secretary by resolution of the two houses of the General Assembly or either of them.

To attend the Governor, whenever required by the Governor, for the purpose of receiving documents that have passed the great seal.

To receive and keep all conveyances and mortgages belonging to the State.

To distribute annually the statutes and the legislative journals.

To distribute the acts of Congress received at the Secretary’s office in the manner prescribed for the statutes of the State.

To keep a receipt book, in which the Secretary shall take from every person to whom a grant shall be delivered, a receipt for the same; but may enclose grants by mail in a registered letter at the expense of the grantee, unless otherwise directed, first entering the same upon the receipt book.

To issue charters and all necessary certificates for the incorporation, domestication, suspension, reinstatement, cancellation and dissolution of corporations as may be required by the corporation laws of the State and maintain a record of the charters and necessary certificates issued.

To issue certificates of registration of trademarks, labels and designs as may be required by law and maintain a record of those certificates of registration.

To maintain a Division of Publications to compile data on the State’s several governmental agencies and for legislative reference.

To receive, enroll and safely preserve the current edition of the State Constitution and all amendments to that edition and to transfer previous editions of the State Constitution and amendments to those editions to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources for preservation and safekeeping in the State Archives.

To serve as a member of such boards and commissions as the Constitution and laws of the State may designate.

To administer the Securities Law of the State, regulating the issuance and sale of securities, as is now or may be directed.

To receive and keep all oaths of public officials required by law to be filed in the Secretary’s office, and as Secretary of State, to administer official oaths to any public official of whom an oath is required.

To receive and maintain a journal of all appointments made to any State board, agency, commission, council or authority that is filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

To regulate the solicitation of contributions pursuant to Chapter 131F of the General Statutes.

To apply for and accept grants from the federal government and its agencies and from any foundation, corporation, association, or individual in order to effectuate the purposes of the Nonprofit Corporation Act, Chapter 55A of the General Statutes, and to further aid in the operation and development of nonprofit corporations. The Secretary shall comply with the terms, conditions, and limitations of grants applied for and accepted and shall expend grant funds pursuant to Chapter 143C of the General Statutes, The State Budget Act.

History.

1868-9, c. 270, s. 45; 1881, c. 63; Code, s. 3340; Rev., s. 5345; C.S., s. 7654; 1941, c. 379, s. 6; 1943, cc. 480, 543; 1967, c. 691, s. 53; 1973, c. 1379, s. 1; 1995, c. 20, s. 9; 1998-212, s. 12.14(c); 1999-316, s. 1; 2006-203, s. 115; 2015-170, s. 4(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(c).

§ 147-36.1.
Deputy Secretary of State.

The duly classified Deputy Secretary of State as reflected by the records of the State Department of Personnel, appointed by the Secretary of State to aid him in the discharge of his duties, shall have the authority to perform all acts and duties of the office in the absence of his chief, or in the case of his inability to act, or under his direction. In exercising such authority, certificates relating to documents and other filings, shall be issued in the name of the Secretary of State, printed, typed, stamped or facsimile signature, and signed by the Deputy Secretary of State.

Employees in the office of the Secretary of State designated as deputy or director of specific divisions in the Department, are empowered to issue certificates relating to documents and other filings within the scope of their division. In exercising such authority the certificates shall be issued in the name of the Secretary of State, printed, typed, stamped or facsimile signature, and signed by the deputy or director indicating his approved title. Provided, however, that if the volume of documents or certificates to be issued makes an embossed seal and the autograph signature of the deputy or director impractical, the documents may be certified and certificates issued under the facsimile signature and seal of the Secretary of State only.

History.

1967, c. 1265; 1987, c. 349.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Those members of the Council of State who have statutory authority to delegate duties may, in conformity with such statutes, attend and vote at meetings of Boards of which they are
ex officio
members through delegates or designated subordinates. The remaining members of the Council of State may make similar delegations or designations where, in the member’s judgment, other duties necessitate his absence and the statute creating his

ex officio

membership does not express or clearly imply an intent of the General Assembly that the powers of such membership be exercised personally. See opinion of Attorney General to the honorable James E. Long, Commissioner of Insurance, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 116 (1986).

§ 147-37.
Secretary of State; fees to be collected.

When no other charge is provided by law, the Secretary of State shall collect such fees for copying any document or record on file in his office which in his discretion bears a reasonable relation to the quantity of copies supplied and the cost of purchasing or leasing and maintaining copying equipment. These fees may be changed from time to time, but a schedule of fees shall be available on request at all times. In addition to copying charges, the Secretary of State shall collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for certifying any document or record on file in his office or for issuing any certificate as to the facts shown by the records on file in his office, except that if two or more certificates for foreign adoption are requested concurrently, the fee for the second and subsequent certificates is five dollars ($5.00).

History.

R.C., c. 102, s. 13; 1870-1, c. 81, s. 3; 1881, c. 79; Code, s. 3725; Rev., s. 2742; C.S., s. 3864; 1979, c. 85, s. 2; 1991, c. 429, s. 1; 1998-212, s. 29A.9(e); 2002-126, s. 29A.32.

§ 147-38.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 85, s. 3.

§ 147-39.
Custodian of statutes, records, deeds, etc.

The Secretary of State is charged with the custody of all statutes and joint resolutions of the legislature, all documents which pass under the great seal, and of all the books, records, deeds, parchments, maps, and papers now deposited in his office or which may hereafter be there deposited pursuant to law, and he shall from time to time make all necessary provisions for their arrangement and preservation. Every deed, conveyance, or other instrument whereby the State or any State agency or institution has acquired title to any real property and which is deposited with the Secretary of State shall be filed by him, and indexed according to the county or counties wherein the real property is situated and the name or names of the grantor or grantors and of the grantee; and the real property shall be briefly described in the index.

History.

R.C., c. 104, s. 105; 1868-9, c. 270, s. 41; 1873-4, c. 129; Code, s. 3337; Rev., s. 5347; C.S., s. 7656; 1957, c. 584, s. 5.

§ 147-40.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 1184, s. 8.

§ 147-41.
To keep records of oyster grants.

The Secretary of State shall keep books of records in which shall be recorded a full description of all grounds granted for oyster beds under the provisions of Chapter 119 of the Laws of 1887, and laws amendatory thereof, and shall keep a map or maps showing the position and limits of all public and private grounds.

History.

1887, c. 119, s. 14; Rev., s. 2381; C.S., s. 7657.

§ 147-42.
Binding original statutes, resolutions, and documents.

The original statutes and joint resolutions passed at each session of the General Assembly the Secretary of State shall immediately thereafter cause to be bound in volumes of convenient size. Each such volume shall be lettered on the back with its title and the date of its session.

History.

1866-7, c. 71; 1868-9, c. 270, s. 46; Code, s. 3343; Rev., s. 5348; C.S., s. 7658.

§ 147-43.
Reports of State officers.

The Secretary of State shall file and keep in his office one copy of each of the reports of State officers in the best binding in which any such report is issued, and the State Librarian shall likewise keep five similarly bound copies of each such report.

History.

Rev., s. 5101; 1911, c. 211, s. 7; C.S., s. 7300.

§§ 147-43.1 through 147-43.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 1184, s. 8.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to printing of Session Laws, see

G.S. 120-34

.

§ 147-44.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1943, c. 48, s. 2.

§ 147-45.
Distribution of copies of State publications.

The Secretary of State shall, at the State’s expense, as soon as possible after publication, provide such number of copies of the Session Laws and Senate and House Journals to federal, State, and local governmental officials, departments and agencies, and to educational institutions of instruction and exchange use, as is determined by the Legislative Services Commission in consultation with the Principal Clerks of the House of Representatives and the Senate. These publications shall be made available in hardbound and electronic format. Each agency or institution entitled to more than one copy shall receive only one of the copies in hardbound format with the remainder in electronic format, unless that agency or institution requests additional hardbound copies from the Secretary of State by August 1 of the calendar year. The Legislative Services Commission, in consultation with the Principal Clerks of the House of Representatives and the Senate, shall determine each year the total number of bound volumes of each publication to be printed and the total number of the electronic copies of each publication to be produced.

Any State agency, department, institution, commission, committee, board, division, bureau, officer, or official that does not receive a copy of the Session Laws may, upon written request from their respective department head to the Secretary of State, and upon the discretion of the Secretary of State as to need, be issued copies of the Session Laws on a permanent loan basis with the understanding that should said copies be needed they will be recalled.

History.

1941, c. 379, s. 1; 1943, c. 48, s. 4; 1945, c. 534; 1949, c. 1178; 1951, c. 287; 1953, cc. 245, 266; 1955, c. 505, s. 6; cc. 989, 990; 1957, c. 269, s. 1; cc. 1061, 1400; 1959, c. 215; c. 1028, s. 3; 1965, c. 503; 1967, c. 691, s. 54; cc. 695, 777, 1038, 1073, 1200; 1969, c. 355; c. 608, s. 1; c. 801, s. 2; c. 852, ss. 1, 2; c. 1190, s. 54; c. 1285; 1973, c. 476, ss. 48, 84, 128, 138, 143, 193; c. 507, s. 5; c. 731, s. 1; c. 762; c. 798, ss. 1, 2; c. 1262, ss. 10, 38; 1975, c. 19, s. 59; c. 879, s. 46; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 115; 1977, c. 379, s. 1; c. 679, s. 8; c. 771, s. 4; 1979, c. 358, s. 27; 1981, c. 412, ss. 4, 5; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1348, s. 2; 1983, c. 842; 1987, c. 827, s. 59; 1989, c. 727, s. 223(b); c. 751, s. 9(b); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 74; 1993, c. 522, s. 18; c. 553, s. 53; 1995, c. 166, s. 2; c. 509, s. 100; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 603, s. 5; c. 743, s. 22; 1997-443, ss. 11A.118(a), 11A.119(a); 1998-202, s. 4(bb); 2000-137, s. 4(ff); 2001-513, s. 16(a).

§ 147-46.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1955, c. 987.

§ 147-46.1.
Publications furnished State departments, bureaus, institutions and agencies.

Upon request of any State department, bureau, institution or agency, and upon authorization by the Governor and Council of State, the Secretary of State shall supply to such department, bureau, institution or agency copies of any State publications then available to replace worn, damaged or lost copies and such additional sets or parts of sets as may be requested to meet the reasonable needs of such departments, bureaus, institutions or agencies, disclosed by the request.

This section shall not authorize the reprinting of any State publications which would not be ordered without reference to the provisions hereof.

History.

1947, c. 639.

§ 147-47.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1955, c. 748.

§ 147-48.
Sale of Laws and Journals.

Such Laws and Journals as may be printed in excess of the number directed to be distributed, the Secretary of State may sell at such price as he deems reasonable, not exceeding cost plus ten percent (10%). All proceeds received from sales made pursuant to this section shall be paid into the State treasury.

History.

1941, c. 379, s. 4; 1943, c. 48, s. 4; 1955, c. 978, s. 2; 1967, c. 691, s. 55; 1977, c. 802, s. 50.30.

§ 147-49.
Disposition of damaged and unsaleable publications.

The Secretary of State is hereby authorized and empowered to dispose of damaged and unsaleable House and Senate Journals and Session Laws of various years at a price to be determined by the Secretary of State.

History.

1939, c. 345; 1967, c. 691, s. 56; 2001-487, s. 93.

§ 147-50.
Publications of State officials and department heads furnished to certain institutions, agencies, etc.

Every State official and every head of a State department, institution or agency issuing any printed report, bulletin, map, or other publication shall, on request, furnish copies of such reports, bulletins, maps or other publications to the following institutions in the number set out below:

University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill 25 copies; University of North Carolina at Charlotte 2 copies; University of North Carolina at Greensboro 2 copies; North Carolina State University at Raleigh 2 copies; East Carolina University at Greenville 2 copies; Duke University 25 copies; Wake Forest College 2 copies; Davidson College 2 copies; North Carolina Supreme Court Library 2 copies; North Carolina Central University 5 copies; Western Carolina University 2 copies; Appalachian State University 2 copies; University of North Carolina at Wilmington 2 copies; North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University 2 copies; Legislative Library 2 copies;

Click to view

and to governmental officials, agencies and departments and to other educational institutions, in the discretion of the issuing official and subject to the supply available, such number as may be requested: Provided that five sets of all such reports, bulletins and publications heretofore issued, insofar as the same are available and without necessitating reprinting, shall be furnished to the North Carolina Central University. The provisions in this section shall not be interpreted to include any of the appellate division reports or advance sheets distributed by the Administrative Office of the Courts. Except for reports, bulletins, and other publications issued for free distribution, this section shall not apply to the North Carolina State Museum of Natural Sciences.

History.

1941, c. 379, s. 5; 1955, c. 505, s. 7; 1967, cc. 1038, 1065; 1969, c. 608, s. 1; c. 852, s. 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 84; c. 598; c. 731, s. 2; c. 776; 1977, c. 377; 1979, c. 591, s. 1; 1981, c. 435; 1993, c. 561, s. 116(j).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

This section does not require the distribution of the S.B.I. Investigative “Bulletin,” because information contained in it is not of public record, but instead is information used by law-enforcement officers to collect and compile evidence for the trial of cases. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Charles Dunn, 45 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 92 (1975).

As to free distribution of certain statutory publications on request to certain institutions,

see opinion of Attorney General to Mr. James H. Thompson, Director, University of North Carolina at Greensboro, 42 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 94 (1972).

§ 147-50.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 771, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to the State Depository Library System, see

G.S. 125-11.5

et seq.

§ 147-51.
Clerks of superior courts responsible for Appellate Division Reports; lending prohibited.

From and after March 9, 1927, the clerks of the superior courts of the State of North Carolina are held officially responsible for the volumes of the North Carolina Appellate Division Reports furnished and to be furnished them by the State.

The said clerks of the various courts shall not lend or permit to be taken from their custody the said Reports, nor shall any person with or without the permission of the said clerks take them from their possession.

History.

1927, c. 259; 1969, c. 1190, s. 55.

§ 147-52.
[Transferred]

Transferred to § 7A-14 by Session Laws 1975, c. 328.

§ 147-53.
[Repealed]

Superseded by Session Laws 1943, c. 716.

§ 147-54.
Printing, distribution and sale of the North Carolina Manual.

The Secretary of State shall have printed biennially for distribution and sale, two thousand three hundred fifty (2,350) copies of the North Carolina Manual, and shall make distribution to the State agencies, individuals, institutions and others as herein set forth.

NORTH CAROLINA STATE GOVERNMENT:

Members of the General Assembly
. . . . .
1 ea.

Officers of the General Assembly
. . . . .
1 ea.

Offices of the Clerk of each House of the General Assembly
. . . . .
1 ea.

Legislative Services Officer
. . . . .
1

Legislative Library
. . . . .
6

Members of the Council of State
. . . . .
2 ea.

Appointed Secretaries of Executive Departments
. . . . .
2 ea.

Personnel of the Department of the Secretary of State
. . . . .
1 ea.

State Board of Elections
. . . . .
2

Divisions of Archives and History, Director
. . . . .
1

Search Room
. . . . .
3

Publications Section
. . . . .
2

State Library
. . . . .
10

Libraries within State Agencies
. . . . .
1 ea.

Justices of the North Carolina Supreme Court
. . . . .
1 ea.

Judges of the North Carolina Court of Appeals
. . . . .
1 ea.

Judges of the North Carolina Superior Court
. . . . .
1 ea.

Supreme Court Library
. . . . .
12

Court of Appeals Library
. . . . .
2

Clerk of the Supreme Court
. . . . .
1

Clerk of the Court of Appeals
. . . . .
1

Reporter of the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals
. . . . .
1

Administrative Office of the Courts
. . . . .
5

NORTH CAROLINA EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS:

University of North Carolina System

The University of North Carolina System Office
. . . . .
12

Chancellors of the Constituent Institutions
. . . . .
1 ea.

University of North Carolina — Chapel Hill Library
. . . . .
15

North Carolina State University Library
. . . . .
5

East Carolina University Library
. . . . .
5

North Carolina Central University Library
. . . . .
5

Appalachian State University Library
. . . . .
4

University of North Carolina — Charlotte Library
. . . . .
4

University of North Carolina — Greensboro Library
. . . . .
4

Western Carolina University Library
. . . . .
4

Other Constituent Institutions Libraries
. . . . .
3 ea.

North Carolina School of the Arts, redesignated effective August 1, 2008,
as the “University of North Carolina School of the Arts”
. . . . .
2

University of North Carolina Chapel Hill School of Government
. . . . .
2

Community Colleges and Technical Institutes
. . . . .
2 ea.

Private Colleges and Universities

Duke University Library
. . . . .
6

Wake Forest University
. . . . .
6

Campbell University Library
. . . . .
5

Davidson College Library
. . . . .
4

All other Libraries of Senior and Junior Colleges
. . . . .
2 ea.

Public and Private Schools containing grades 8-12
. . . . .
1 ea.

COUNTY GOVERNMENT:

Clerks of Court
. . . . .
1 ea.

Registers of Deeds
. . . . .
1 ea.

Public Libraries of North Carolina
. . . . .
1 ea.

FEDERAL GOVERNMENT:

President of the United States
. . . . .
1

North Carolina Members of the Presidential Cabinet
. . . . .
1 ea.

North Carolina Members of the United States Congress
. . . . .
2 ea.

Library of Congress
. . . . .
3

Resident Judges of the Federal Judiciary

and United States Attorneys in North Carolina
. . . . .
1 ea.

Secretaries of State of the United States

and Territories
. . . . .
1 ea.

After making the above distribution, the remainder shall be sold at the cost of publication plus tax and postage and the proceeds from such sales deposited with the State Treasurer for use by the Publications Division of the Secretary of State’s Office to defray the expense of publishing the North Carolina Manual. Libraries and educational institutions not covered in the above distribution shall be entitled to a twenty percent (20%) discount on the cost of any purchase(s).

History.

1933, c. 115, s. 2; 1977, c. 378; 1995, c. 509, s. 101; 2001-424, s. 14F.1; 2006-264, s. 29(p); 2008-192, s. 10; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-12, s. 19; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement” for “State Board of Elections.”

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the change to the reference.

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 24.2, provides: “The Department of the Secretary of State shall report on the distribution and sale of the North Carolina Manual as provided in

G.S. 147-54

. The report shall include: (i) the number of copies that were distributed and the agencies and institutions to which they were distributed; (ii) the cost of distributing the manual; (iii) the number of copies that were sold and whether they were purchased by the general public, agencies, or institutions; and (iv) the amount of revenue realized from the sale of the manual.

“The Department shall also study and report on the feasibility of making the manual available via the Internet.

“The Department shall submit its report to the Appropriations Subcommittees on General Government of the Senate and House of Representatives and to the Fiscal Research Division by April 1, 2004.”

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2003’.”

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 49.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2003-284, s. 49.5 is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-264, s. 29(p), effective August 27, 2006, substituted “University of North Carolina-Chapel Hill School of Government” for “Institute of Government” in the middle of the table.

Session Laws 2008-192, s. 10, effective August 1, 2008, inserted “redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the ‘University of North Carolina School of the Arts,’ ” following “North Carolina School of the Arts” on the list of state agencies, individuals, institutions eligible to receive the “North Carolina Manual.”

Session Laws 2018-12, s. 19, effective July 1, 2018, substituted “The University of North Carolina System Office” for “General Administration Offices” in the list of North Carolina Educational Institutions eligible to receive the North Carolina Manual.

§ 147-54.1.
Division of Publications; duties.

The Secretary of State is authorized to set up a division to be designated as the Division of Publications and to appoint a director thereof who shall be known as the Director of Publications. This Division shall publish the North Carolina Manual, Directory, Index of Local Legislation and such other publications as may be useful to the members and committees of the General Assembly and other officials of the State and of the various counties and cities. Unless otherwise required by law, the Secretary may publish electronically information permitted or required by this section. The Secretary may sell these publications at such prices as the Secretary deems reasonable; the proceeds of sale shall be paid into the State treasury.

The Division shall also perform all such other duties as may be assigned by the Secretary of State.

History.

1915, c. 202, ss. 1, 2; C.S., ss. 6147, 6148; 1939, c. 316; 1971, c. 685, s. 3; 1977, c. 802, s. 50.31; 1999-260, s. 2.

§ 147-54.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 477, s. 2.

§ 147-54.3.
Land records management program.

The Secretary of State shall administer a land records management program for the purposes (i) of advising registers of deeds, local tax officials, and local planning officials about sound management practices, and (ii) of establishing greater uniformity in local land records systems. The management program shall consist of the activities provided for in subsections (b) through (e) of this section, and other related activities essential to the effective conduct of the management program.

The Secretary of State, in cooperation with the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources and in accordance with

G.S. 121-5(c)

and

G.S. 132-8.1

, shall establish minimum standards and provide advice and technical assistance to local governments in implementing and maintaining minimum standards with regard to the following aspects of land records management:

Uniform indexing of land records;

Uniform recording and indexing procedures for maps, plats and condominiums; and

Security and reproduction of land records.

(b1)

The Department of Secretary of State, in cooperation with the North Carolina Association of Registers of Deeds, Inc., and the Real Property Section of the North Carolina Bar Association, shall adopt, pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, rules specifying the minimum indexing standards established pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and procedures for complying with those minimum standards in land records management. A copy of the standards adopted shall be posted in the office of the register of deeds in each county of the State.

The Secretary of State shall conduct a program for the preparation of county base maps pursuant to standards prepared by the Secretary.

(c1)

The Secretary of State, shall, in cooperation with the Secretary of Revenue, conduct a program for the preparation of county cadastral maps pursuant to standards prepared by the Secretary of State.

Upon the joint request of any board of county commissioners and the register of deeds and subject to available resources of personnel and funds, the Secretary shall make a management study of the office of register of deeds, using assistance from the Office of State Human Resources. At the conclusion of the study, the Secretary shall make nonbinding recommendations to the board, the register of deeds, and to the General Assembly.

(d1)

The Secretary of State shall make comparative salary studies periodically of all registers of deeds offices and at the conclusion of each study the Secretary of State shall present his written findings and shall make recommendations to the board of county commissioners and register of deeds of each county.

The Secretary of State, in cooperation with the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources and in accordance with

G.S. 121-5(c)

and

G.S. 132-8.1

, shall undertake research and provide advice and technical assistance to local governments on the following aspects of land records management:

Centralized recording systems;

Filming, filing, and recording techniques and equipment;

Computerized land records systems; and

Storage and retrieval of land records.

An advisory committee on land records is created to assist the Secretary in administering the land records management program. The Secretary of State shall appoint 12 members to the committee; one member shall be appointed from each of the organizations listed below from persons nominated by the organization:

The North Carolina Association of Assessing Officers;

The North Carolina Section of the American Society of Photogrammetry;

The North Carolina Chapter of the American Institute of Planners;

The North Carolina Section of the American Society of Civil Engineers;

The North Carolina Property Mappers’ Association;

The North Carolina Association of Registers of Deeds;

The North Carolina Bar Association;

The North Carolina Society of Land Surveyors; and

The North Carolina Association of County Commissioners.

In addition, three members from the public at large shall be appointed. The members of the committee shall be appointed for four-year terms, except that the initial terms for members listed in positions (1) through (4) above and for two of the members-at-large shall be two years; thereafter all appointments shall be for four years. The Secretary of State shall appoint the chairman, and the committee shall meet at the call of the chairman. The Secretary of State in making the appointments shall try to achieve geographical and population balance on the advisory committee; one third of the appointments shall be persons from the most populous counties in the State containing approximately one third of the State’s population, one third from the least populous counties containing approximately one third of the State’s population, and one third shall be from the remaining moderately populous counties containing approximately one third of the State’s population. Each organization shall nominate one nominee each from the more populous, moderately populous, and less populous counties of the State. The members of the committee shall receive per diem and subsistence and travel allowances as provided in

G.S. 138-5

.

History.

1977, c. 771, s. 4; c. 932, s. 1; 1985, c. 479, s. 165(d), (e); 1987, c. 738, s. 158(a); 1989, c. 523, s. 8; c. 727, ss. 169, 218(116a); c. 751, s. 14; 1991, c. 689, ss. 181(b), 181(c); c. 697, s. 1; 1993, c. 258, s. 1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2015-241, s. 14.30(t).

§ 147-54.4.
Certification of local government property mappers.

Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this section:

Department. — The Department of the Secretary of State.

Large-scale. — A scale that uses an inch to represent no more than 400 feet.

Local government. — A county as defined in

G.S. 153A-10

and a city as defined in

G.S. 160A-1

.

Property mapper. — A person who is employed by a local government and is responsible for creating and maintaining large-scale cadastral maps.

Certification. — The Department shall establish a certification program for property mappers. The purpose of the program is to protect and enhance the State’s investment in local government large-scale cadastral maps. To be certified as a property mapper, an applicant must meet the following minimum requirements and the additional requirements set by the Department:

Be at least 18 years old.

Hold a high school diploma or certificate of equivalency.

Achieve a passing score in courses of instruction approved by the Department covering the following topics:

The principles and techniques of property mapping.

The laws of North Carolina governing the listing, appraisal, and assessment of real property for taxation.The Department shall establish requirements for certification as a property mapper that are in addition to these minimum requirements. The additional requirements shall ensure that an applicant who is certified as a property mapper has the minimum skills necessary to create and maintain large-scale cadastral maps. In establishing these additional requirements, the Department may consult with the advisory committee on land records created by

G.S. 147-54.3(f)

, the North Carolina Property Mappers’ Association, and other relevant professional groups. The additional requirements may include mapping experience and a passing score on an examination administered by the Department.

Renewal. — A certification as a property mapper must be renewed every two years. Attendance of 24 hours of continuing education approved by the Department is a condition of renewal of a certification. The Department shall publish a list of courses acceptable for meeting this continuing education requirement.

Application and Fees. — An applicant for certification as a property mapper or renewal of certification as a property mapper must file an application with the Department. The applicant must submit a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) with the application. Fees collected under this section shall be credited to the General Fund.

Rules. — The Department may adopt rules to implement this section. Chapter 150B of the General Statutes governs the adoption of rules by the Department.

History.

1993, c. 326, s. 1.

§ 147-54.5.
Investor Protection and Education Trust Fund; administration; limitations on use of the Fund.

The Investor Protection and Education Trust Fund created in the Department of the Secretary of State as an expendable trust account to be used by the Secretary of State only for the purposes set forth in this section.

The proceeds of the Investor Protection and Education Trust Fund shall be used by the Secretary of State to provide investor protection and education to the general public and to potential securities investors in the State through:

The use of the media, including television and radio public service announcements and printed materials; and

The sponsorship of educational seminars, whether live, recorded, or through other electronic means.

The proceeds of the Investor Protection and Education Trust Fund shall not be used for:

Travel expenses of the Secretary of State or staff of the Department of the Secretary of State, unless those expenses are directly related to specific investor protection and education activities performed in accordance with this section.

General operating expenses of the Department of the Secretary of State, or to supplement General Fund appropriations to the Department of the Secretary of State for other than investor education and protection activities.

Promoting the Secretary of State or the Department of the Secretary of State.

Expenditures from the Investor Protection and Education Trust Fund shall be made in compliance with State purchasing and contracting requirements for competitive bidding in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

Revenues derived from consent orders resulting from negotiated settlements of securities investigations by the Secretary of State shall be credited to the Fund. The State Treasurer shall invest the assets of the Fund according to law. Any interest or other investment income earned by the Investor Protection and Education Trust Fund shall remain in the Fund. The balance of the Investor Protection and Education Trust Fund at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.

Beginning January 1, 1997, the Department of the Secretary of State shall report annually to the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly, the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government on the expenditures from the Investor Protection and Education Trust Fund and on the effectiveness of investor awareness education efforts of the Department of the Secretary of State.

History.

1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 13; 2021-180, s. 37.11(b).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.13, made the amendments to subsection (f) of this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.11(b), effective November 18, 2021, and applicable to reports submitted on or after that date.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.11(b), in subsection (f), deleted “General Assembly’s” preceding “Fiscal”; substituted “of the General Assembly,” for “and to”; substituted “Operations, and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government” for “Operations.” For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 147-54.6.
International relations assistance.

The Secretary of State may offer direct and indirect assistance in matters relating to international relations and protocol to other governmental agencies and units of the State of North Carolina. The assistance may be provided upon request of the intended recipient when resources are available for these purposes.

The Secretary of State, on behalf of the State, may accept gifts, donations, devises, or other forms of voluntary contributions, apply for grants from public and private sources, and may expend funds received under this subsection for the purpose of promoting international relations and hosting foreign dignitaries and leaders in North Carolina. All funds and gifts received pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to audit by the Office of the State Auditor and all funds shall be expended in conformity with the Executive Budget Act and shall become the property of the State.

History.

1999-260, s. 3; 2011-284, s. 104.